Wisconsin, session 2025, SB368.
do enact as follows:SB368,11Section 1. 948.55 of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB368,2,72948.55 Storage of firearm if children present. (1) Whoever resides with 3a child, or knows a child will be present in his or her residence, may not store or 4leave a firearm at his or her residence unless the firearm is in a securely locked box 5or container or in a locked location that a reasonable person would believe to be 6secure or unless a trigger lock is engaged on the firearm. This prohibition does not 7apply to a person who is going armed with the firearm.SB368,2,88(2) A person who violates sub. (1) is guilty of the following:SB368,2,99(a) For a first violation, a Class A misdemeanor.SB368,2,1010(b) For a 2nd or subsequent violation, a Class I felony.SB368,211Section 2. 968.02 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB368,2,1812968.02 (4) If the alleged violator under s. 948.55 (2) or 948.60 (2) (c) is or was 13the parent or guardian of a child who is injured or dies as a result of an accidental 14shooting, the district attorney may consider, among other factors, the impact of the 15injury or death on the alleged violator when deciding whether to issue a complaint 16regarding the alleged violation. This subsection does not restrict the factors that a 17district attorney may consider in deciding whether to issue a complaint regarding 18any alleged violation.SB368,319Section 3. 968.07 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB368,3,220968.07 (3) If the alleged violator under s. 948.55 (2) or 948.60 (2) (c) is or was 21the parent or guardian of a child who is injured or dies as a result of an accidental 1shooting, no law enforcement officer may arrest the alleged violator until at least 7 2days after the date of the shooting.SB368,3,33